Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-209.01
Captive, defined.

Captive, as it pertains to captive wildlife, captive wild birds, or captive wild mammals, means the condition of captivity.

Laws 2002, LB 1003, § 16.